Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-827
Lottery game retailer; cooperation with director; termination of contract.

A lottery game retailer shall cooperate with the director by using point-of-purchase materials, posters, and other educational, informational, and marketing materials when requested to do so by the director. Lack of cooperation shall be sufficient cause for termination of a contract.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 27;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 47.